Utah statutes.
31A-14-204.   Registered agent and registered office.

(1) Title 16, Chapter 17, Model Registered Agents Act, applies to the registered agent and service of process on all foreign insurers authorized to do business in this state.  Whenever the words "Division of Corporations and Commercial Code" or "division" are used, they mean "insurance commissioner."

(2)  The principal office shall have sufficient personnel to provide information and assistance to Utah insureds, unless the insurer informs policyholders on the policy or on other written communications of a toll-free telephone connection accessible at normal business hours in this state.

